Vermont, session 2025-2026, S156.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 455 is amended to read:
§ 455. DEFINITIONS
(a) As used in this subchapter:
VT LEG #383212 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.156
2025 Page 2 of 11
* * *
(4) “Average final compensation” shall mean:
* * *
(E) For Group A, C, F, or G members who retire on or after July 1,
2012, an increase in compensable hours in any year used to calculate average
final compensation that exceeds 120 percent of average compensable hours,
except for compensable hours resulting from mandatory overtime, shall be
excluded from that year when calculating average final compensation.
* * *
(11) “Member” means any employee included in the membership of the
Retirement System under section 457 of this title.
* * *
(F) “Group G member” means:
(i) the following employees who are first employed in the
positions listed in this subdivision (F)(i) on or after July 1, 2023, or who are
members of the System as of June 30, 2022 and make an irrevocable election
to prospectively join Group G on or before June 30, 2023, pursuant to the
terms set by the Board: facility employees of the Department of Corrections, as
Department of Corrections employees who provide direct security and
treatment services to offenders under supervision in the community, employees
of a facility for justice-involved youth, and employees of the Vermont
VT LEG #383212 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.156
2025 Page 3 of 11
Psychiatric Care Hospital or its successor in interest, who provide direct
patient care, and classified employees of the public safety answering points,
the Family Services Division of the Department for Children and Families, the
Vermont Veterans’ Home, and the Department of State’s Attorneys and
Sheriffs; and
* * *
Sec. 2. 3 V.S.A. § 458 is amended to read:
§ 458. CREDITABLE SERVICE; MILITARY SERVICE
(a) With respect to service rendered prior to the date of membership, each
employee who, pursuant to subsection 457(a) of this title, became a member of
the retirement system shall have included as prior service hereunder all service
credited to him or her the employee as creditable service under the terms of
one or both of the predecessor systems, provided his or her the employee’s
membership continues unbroken until his or her the employee’s retirement.
* * *
(j) Credit shall also be granted for any member who, prior to becoming a
member of the System, was employed in a temporary or seasonal position for
the State as defined in section 331 of this title.
Sec. 3. 3 V.S.A. § 459 is amended to read:
§ 459. NORMAL AND EARLY RETIREMENT
* * *
VT LEG #383212 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.156
2025 Page 4 of 11
(b) Normal retirement allowance.
* * *
(2)(A) Upon normal retirement, a Group C member shall receive a
normal retirement allowance that shall be equal to 50 percent of the member’s
average final compensation; provided, however, that if the member has not
completed 20 years of creditable service at retirement, or, if earlier, the date of
attainment of such age as may be applicable under the provisions of
subdivision (a)(4) of this section, the member’s allowance shall be multiplied
by the ratio that the number of the member’s years of creditable service at
retirement, or such earlier date, bears to 20.
(B) For a Group C member, for each year of service that is completed
on or after July 1, 2022 after attaining the later of 50 years of age or
completing 20 years of service, a member’s maximum normal retirement
allowance shall increase by an amount equal to one and one-half percent of the
member’s average final compensation.
* * *
(6)(A) Upon normal retirement pursuant to subdivisions
455(a)(13)(E)(i), (iii), (iv), and (vi) of this chapter, a Group G member shall
receive a normal retirement allowance equal to two and one-half of a percent
of the member’s average final compensation times years of membership
VT LEG #383212 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.156
2025 Page 5 of 11
service in Group G. The maximum retirement allowance shall be 50 percent of
average final compensation.
(B) Upon normal retirement pursuant to subdivisions
455(a)(13)(E)(ii) and (v) of this chapter, a Group G member shall receive a
normal retirement allowance equal to two and one-half of a percent of the
member’s average final compensation times years of membership service in
Group G. The maximum retirement allowance shall be 60 percent of average
final compensation one and one-half percent of the member’s average final
compensation.
* * *
Sec. 4. 3 V.S.A. § 473 is amended to read:
§ 473. FUNDS
(a) Assets. All of the assets of the Retirement System shall be credited to
the Vermont State Retirement Fund.
(b) Member contributions.
* * *
(2) Groups A, C, D, F, and G members.
(A) Group A members. Commencing on July 1, 2016, contributions
shall be 6.55 percent of compensation for Group A members.
* * *
VT LEG #383212 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.156
2025 Page 6 of 11
(E) Group G members. Commencing on July 1, 2023, the
contribution rate for Group G members shall be based on the quartile in which
a member’s hourly rate of pay falls. Quartiles shall be determined annually in
the first full pay period of each fiscal year by the Department of Human
Resources based on the combined hourly rate of pay of all Group F and Group
G members. The contribution rates shall be based on the schedule set forth
below:
(i) Based on the quartiles for the first full pay period of each fiscal
year and effective the first full pay period in that fiscal year, for members who
have an hourly rate of pay in any pay period below the 25th percentile of
Group F and Group G member hourly rates of pay, the contribution rate shall
be 11.23 percent of compensation Commencing the first full pay period in
fiscal year 2026, the contribution rate for Group G members shall be 8.93
percent of compensation.
(ii) Based on the quartiles for the first full pay period of each
fiscal year and effective the first full pay period in that fiscal year, for members
who have an hourly rate of pay in any pay period at the 25th percentile and
below the 50th percentile of Group F and Group G member hourly rates of
pay, the contribution rate shall be as follows:
(I) commencing in fiscal year 2024, 12.23 percent of
compensation; and
VT LEG #383212 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.156
2025 Page 7 of 11
(II) commencing in fiscal year 2025 and annually thereafter,
12.73 percent of compensation Commencing the first full pay period in fiscal
year 2026, the contribution rate for Group G members shall be 9.43 percent of
compensation.
(iii) Based on the quartiles for the first full pay period of each
fiscal year and effective the first full pay period in that fiscal year, for members
who have an hourly rate of pay in any pay period at the 50th percentile and
below the 75th percentile of Group F and Group G member hourly rates of
pay, the contribution rate shall be as follows:
(I) commencing in fiscal year 2024, 12.23 percent of
compensation;
(II) commencing in fiscal year 2025, 12.73 percent of
compensation; and
(III) commencing in fiscal year 2026 and annually thereafter,
13.23 percent of compensation Commencing the first full pay period in fiscal
year 2026 and annually thereafter, the contribution rate for Group G members
shall be 9.93 percent of compensation.
(iv) Based on the quartiles for the first full pay period of each
fiscal year and effective the first full pay period in that fiscal year, for members
who have an hourly rate of pay in any pay period at or above the 75th
VT LEG #383212 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.156
2025 Page 8 of 11
percentile of Group F and Group G member hourly rates of pay, the
contribution rate shall be as follows:
(I) commencing in fiscal year 2024, 12.23 percent of
compensation;
(II) commencing in fiscal year 2025, 12.73 percent of
compensation;
(III) commencing in fiscal year 2026, 13.23 percent of
compensation; and
(IV) commencing in fiscal year 2027 and annually thereafter,
13.73 percent of compensation. [Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 5. 3 V.S.A. § 477a is amended to read:
§ 477a. ELECTIONS
(a)(1) Any member who has rendered 15 years of creditable service and
who has, prior to becoming a member of the System, served a minimum of one
full year of full-time service in the military or one full year of full-time service
as a member of the Cadet Nurse Corps in World War II, the Peace Corps,
VISTA, or AmeriCorps for which the member has derived no military pension
benefits, may elect to have included in the member’s creditable service all or
any part of the member’s military, Cadet Nurse Corps, Peace Corps, VISTA,
or AmeriCorps service not exceeding five years. Any member who so elects
VT LEG #383212 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.156
2025 Page 9 of 11
shall deposit in the Fund by a single contribution the amount or amounts
determined by the System’s actuary to be cost neutral to the System.
(2)(A) Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection (a), any
member shall, upon application, be granted up to three years of credit for
military service during the following conflicts or periods:
(i) June 25, 1950, through January 31, 1955,; February 28, 1961,
through August 4, 1964, if service was performed in what is now the Republic
of Vietnam,; and August 5, 1964, through May 7, 1975,;
(ii) Operation Urgent Fury;
(iii) Operation Desert Shield;
(iv) Operation Desert Storm;
(v) Operation Desert Sabre;
(vi) Operation Gothic Serpent;
(vii) Operation Deliberate Force;
(viii) Operation Joint Endeavor;
(ix) Operation Allied Force;
(x) Operation Enduring Freedom;
(xi) Operation Freedom Sentinel;
(xii) Operation Iraqi Freedom; and
(xiii) Operation Odyssey Dawn.
VT LEG #383212 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.156
2025 Page 10 of 11
(B) A member granted credit under this subdivision (a)(2) shall not
be required to make a contribution, provided the member has rendered 15 years
of creditable service and, prior to becoming a member, served a minimum of
one full year of full-time service in the military for which he or she the
member has derived no military pension benefits.
(3) The provisions of this subsection shall also be available to State
employees who are not members of the classified system and who elect to
participate in the defined Contribution Retirement Plan under chapter 16A of
this title.
(4) Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event of a conflict between the
provisions of this subsection and the provisions of 10 U.S.C. § 12736
concerning the counting of the same full-time military service toward both
military and State pensions, the provisions of the U. S. Code shall control.
* * *
Sec. 6. 3 V.S.A. § 480c is added to read:
§ 480c. CONTRACTUAL RIGHTS; EFFECT OF AMENDMENT
The provisions of this chapter shall be deemed to establish a contractual
relationship between a member and the Retirement System, provided that the
contractual relationship is established following a member’s initial
contribution to the Retirement System. No amendments shall be made that
VT LEG #383212 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.156
2025 Page 11 of 11
shall diminish or impair a member’s rights or benefits provided under this
contractual relationship.
Sec. 7. MILITARY CONFLICTS AS CREDITABLE SERVICE IMPACTS
STUDY
The State Treasurer shall study the fiscal impacts of including the military
conflicts listed in Sec. 5 of this act for eligible creditable service under 3
V.S.A. § 477a and report findings and recommendations to the House
Committee on Government Operations and Military Affairs and the Senate
Committee on Government Operations on or before January 15, 2026.
Sec. 8. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025, except that Sec. 5 (elections) shall
take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #383212 v.1